tr_test.dic
kekelemek/є
tezlemek/є
eklemlemek/є
örneksemek/є
yelkenlemek/є
imek/є
biçemlemek/є
demetlemek/є
eylemek/є
denetlemek/є
naniklemek/є
tekmelemek/є
tertiplemek/є
çitlemek/є
filizlemek/є
iliklemek/є
parametrelemek/є
resimlemek/є
ciltlemek/є
gemlemek/є
zanneylemek/є
dinlemek/є
sezinlemek/є
gözlemlemek/є
kemrelemek/є
değerlemek/є
çemberlemek/є
fitillemek/є
kişnemek/є
yinelemek/є
abanabilme/є
adlandırabilme/є
akdedilme/є
aktarabilme/є
aldırtabilme/є
alçalabilme/є
alışılagelme/є
anımsanabilme/є
araştırabilme/є
arşivleyebilme/є
atfedebilme/є
avlayıverme/є
ayartılabilme/є
ayırabilme/є
azmettirme/є
ağlayabilme/є
aşırılabilme/є
bakışabilme/є
bastırıverme/є
bağlayabilme/є
başlanabilme/є
beklemeli/є
belgelenme/є
belirme/є
belleyiverme/є
benimseyiverme/є
berelenebilme/є
bestelenebilme/є
bezdirme/є
beğendirebilme/є
bildirişme/є
bilgilendirilebilme/є
bilme/є
biriktirebilme/є
birleştirmeci/є
bitiştirme/є
biçiverme/є
boyanabilme/є
bozuluverme/є
boşalabilme/є
budayıverme/є
bulunabilme/є
bunayabilme/є
buğulanabilme/є
bölüştürebilme/є
bütünleme/є
büyüyebilme/є
bırakabilme/є
cayıverme/є
cezalandırabilme/є
cisimlendirme/є
daldırabilme/є
damıtabilme/є
dayandırabilme/є
dağıtıverme/є
dehletme/є
delirtebilme/є
demlenme/є
denetleyiverme/є
depolanabilme/є
deriştirme/є
destekleme/є
deviriverme/є
deyiverme/є
değilleme/є
değiştirilebilme/є
didikleyebilme/є
dikizlenme/є
dilimleme/є
dindirilme/є
dinletebilme/є
direnme/є
dizdirilebilme/є
dizinlenme/є
dokuyabilme/є
dondurabilme/є
doğuverme/є
döküverme/є
dövenci/є
düzebilme/є
düzenlettirme/є
düşgelme/є
edememek/є
eklemeli/є
elektrikleme/є
elleyebilme/є
emretme/є
enetme/є
eritebilme/є
erteleme/є
esirgenme/є
estirme/є
ettirme/є
evlenebilme/є
ezdirme/є
eğinme/є
eğriltme/є
felfelleme/є
fingirdeşme/є
frenlenme/є
garantileyebilme/є
gebrelenme/є
gelinme/є
genelme/є
gerekseme/є
getirilme/є
gevşetme/є
geçgeçleme/є
geçiverme/є
gideriverme/є
girme/є
gizletme/є
gönderebilme/є
görevlendirilebilme/є
görüşülebilme/є
gözetletme/є
göğüslenme/є
gülebilme/є
güncelleyebilme/є
güvenceleme/є
haberleştirme/є
haletme/є
hapsettirme/є
hasredebilme/є
hazmedilme/є
hesaplaşabilme/є
hissedilme/є
hüzünlenebilme/є
ilerlemeci/є
ilintileme/є
imlenme/є
incelettirme/є
indirme/є
inletme/є
irkiltme/є
istiflenme/є
ittirme/є
içilme/є
iğrenilme/є
işkillenme/є
kabarıverme/є
kaldırtıverme/є
kapatılabilme/є
kardeşlenme/є
katletme/є
kaybetme/є
kayıverme/є
kederlenme/є
kenetlenebilme/є
kesilme/є
keyfetme/є
killeme/є
kişnetme/є
konuşuverme/є
koyabilme/є
kurabilme/є
kuruyuverme/є
köklenme/є
köstekleme/є
kükretme/є
kütürdeme/є
kırabilme/є
kıyabilme/є
lekeleme/є
mahvedebilme/є
meshetme/є
mühimseme/є
naklettirme/є
nemlenme/є
nihayetlendirme/є
odaklayabilme/є
oluverme/є
oturtabilme/є
paketleyebilme/є
pataklayabilme/є
peltelenme/є
perçinletme/є
pişirme/є
pörtletme/є
raptiyelenme/є
renkleniverme/є
sabitleme/є
sakınabilme/є
sansürleyebilme/є
sarılıverme/є
saydırabilme/є
sekme/є
sepeleme/є
serilebilme/є
serpiştirme/є
sesletme/є
sevişebilme/є
sezdirebilme/є
seçmeci/є
sildirilme/є
silkinebilme/є
sinirlendirme/є
sivriltilme/є
soluyabilme/є
soğutabilme/є
söndürülebilme/є
söyleşilme/є
süngületme/є
sürmeletme/є
sütlenme/є
sırıtabilme/є
sığınabilme/є
tanımlayabilme/є
tarayabilme/є
tasdikleyebilme/є
taşıverme/є
tembihlenme/є
tepeletme/є
terazilenme/є
teyellenme/є
titizlenme/є
toplatabilme/є
tutuşabilme/є
tükettirme/є
tütsüleme/є
tırmanabilme/є
utanabilme/є
uyutabilme/є
uzlaştırabilme/є
vardırabilme/є
vergileme/є
vuruverme/є
yakınabilme/є
yanılabilme/є
yaralanabilme/є
yarıştırabilme/є
yazdırabilme/є
ye/є
yelleme/є
yeniletebilme/є
yerleşilme/є
yetişebilme/є
yeşillendirme/є
yiyebilme/є
yudumlayabilme/є
yönelme/є
yüceltebilme/є
yükseltgeme/є
yüzlemece/є
yıkıverme/є
zedeleyebilme/є
zincirleme/є
çaldırabilme/є
çarpabilme/є
çatlayıverme/є
çekememe/є
çekiçleme/є
çekmeli/є
çelmeleyebilme/є
çentikleme/є
çevirtebilme/є
çeşnileme/є
çimlendirebilme/є
çizdirtme/є
çoğalıverme/є
çözgüleme/є
çıldırıverme/є
ödüllendirilme/є
öngörebilme/є
öteleyebilme/є
öğrenebilme/є
ürperme/є
ısıtabilme/є
şinikleme/є
